Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-304.01
Nebraska State Colleges; new capital construction; appropriation; percentage used for works of art; when.

After January 1, 1979, at least one percent of any appropriation for the original construction of any public building under the supervision of the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall be spent for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be an integral part of the structure, attached to the structure, detached within or outside of the structure, or may be exhibited by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges in other public facilities.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 14.